North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-36 Indian Affairs Commission

54-36-01.
Commission — Members — Officers — Expenses of members.

The North Dakota Indian affairs commission consists of the governor, three members appointed by the governor from the state at large, two of whom must be of Indian descent, must be enrolled members of a tribe, and must be current voting residents of the state, and the chairperson, or the chairperson’s designee, of the Standing Rock Sioux Tribe; the Spirit Lake Tribe; the Three Affiliated Tribes of the Fort Berthold Reservation; the Turtle Mountain Band of Chippewa Indians; and the Sisseton-Wahpeton Oyate of the Lake Traverse Reservation. The governor is the chairperson of the commission. The commission shall meet quarterly or as otherwise agreed. Members of the commission or the chairperson’s designee are entitled to receive mileage and expenses for attending each meeting as are allowed other state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 324, § 1; 1955, ch. 314, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3601; S.L. 1959, ch. 370, § 1; 1961, ch. 332, § 23; 1967, ch. 74, § 17; 1969, ch. 450, § 1; 1971, ch. 507, § 1; 1975, ch. 483, § 1; 1981, ch. 528, § 19; 1987, ch. 643, § 1; 1991, ch. 95, § 39; 1991, ch. 602, § 2; 2007, ch. 476, § 1; 2009, ch. 505, § 1.

Cross-References.

Mileage and travel expenses of state officers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-08-03 to 44-08-05.1, 54-06-09.

Law Reviews.

Indian Law Symposium, 48 N.D. L. Rev. 533.

Indian Law Symposium, 51 N.D. L. Rev. 11 (1974).

Tribal Administration of Natural Resource Development, Russel L. Barsh and J. Youngblood Henderson, 52 N.D. L. Rev. 307 (1976).

54-36-02.
Employees — Duties — Compensation.

The governor, after consultation with the members of the commission, shall appoint an executive director of the Indian affairs commission who must serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor may employ such other personnel, as the governor deems necessary, and shall prescribe duties and fix compensation.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 324, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3602; 1991, ch. 602, § 3.

54-36-03.
Powers and duties — Continuing appropriation.

The Indian affairs commission may assist and mobilize the support of state and federal agencies in assisting Indian individuals and groups in North Dakota, especially the five tribal councils, as the Indian individuals and tribal councils seek to develop their own goals, project plans for achieving those goals, and implement those plans. The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations, and services from any source which are appropriated on a continuing basis for the purposes of the commission. The commission’s duties are to:

Investigate any phase of Indian affairs and to assemble and make available the facts needed by tribal, state, and federal agencies to work effectively together.

Assist tribal, state, and federal agencies in developing programs whereby Indian citizens may achieve more adequate standards of living.

Assist tribal groups in developing increasingly effective institutions of self-government.

Work for greater understanding and improved relationships between Indians and non-Indians.

Seek increased participation by Indian citizens in local and state affairs.

Confer with and coordinate officials and agencies of other governmental units and congressional committees with regard to Indian needs and goals.

Encourage and propose agreements and accords between federal, state, and local agencies and the several tribal governments, and, pursuant to chapter 54-40.2, to assist in monitoring and negotiating agreements and accords when requested by an affected tribe.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 324, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3603; S.L. 1971, ch. 507, § 2; 1991, ch. 602, § 4; 2009, ch. 505, § 2.

54-36-04.
Public officers to cooperate.

All public officers, both state and local, shall upon request furnish the Indian affairs commission such available information as it may require for its purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 324, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3604.

54-36-05.
Meetings — Quorum.

At any meeting of the commission a majority of the members constitutes a quorum and a majority of the quorum may act in any matter falling within the jurisdiction of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 324, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3605; S.L. 1991, ch. 602, § 5.

54-36-06.
Report and recommendations.

The Indian affairs commission may submit its recommendations to the legislative assembly in the form of proposed legislation or resolutions and may submit a report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 324, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-3606; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 64; 1973, ch. 403, § 49; 1975, ch. 466, § 52; 1995, ch. 350, § 48.

54-36-07.
Appropriation. [Repealed]

Omitted.

54-36-08.
Indian affairs commission printing fund for publications — Appropriation.

There is created a revolving fund known as the Indian affairs commission printing fund. All moneys collected by the commission from fees from persons purchasing publications and informal and educational materials produced or distributed by the commission and moneys received from any person for producing and distributing publications and informational and educational materials must be deposited into the Indian affairs commission printing fund. Money in the Indian affairs commission printing fund and earnings on the money in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission to defray expenses incurred by the commission in producing and distributing publications and informational and educational materials. This fund is not subject to section 54-44.1-11. If on the first day of July in any year the amount of money in the Indian affairs commission printing fund is more than twenty-five thousand dollars, the amount in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars must be transferred to the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 5, § 2.

54-36-09.
Publications — Fees.

The commission may produce and distribute publications and informational and educational materials and may charge a fee for the publication. The fee must be established at an amount equal to the postage and printing costs of the publication.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 5, § 2.

54-36-10.
North Dakota American Indian business development office.

A North Dakota American Indian business development office is established within the commission to assist North Dakota American Indian tribal and individual economic development representatives, businesses, and entrepreneurs with access to state and federal programs designed to assist these business interests. The commission shall cooperate with the department of commerce in the administration of the office. The office shall provide services to assist in the formation of partnerships between American Indian and non-American Indian businesses. The commission may contract with a third party for the provision of services for the office. If the commission contracts with a third party under this section, all data and databases collected and created by the third party in performing services for the office are the property of the commission and the third party.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 5, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.